California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 planning organization and transportation planning agency, in cooperation with the department, congestion management agencies, cities, counties, and affected transit operators, shall select and program projects in conformance with federal law. The metropolitan planning organization and transportation planning agency shall submit its Federal Transportation Improvement Program prepared pursuant to Section 134 of Title 23 of the United States Code to the department for incorporation into the Federal Statewide Transportation Improvement Program not later than October 1 of each even-numbered year. The Federal Transportation Improvement Programs shall, at a minimum, include the years covered by the Federal Statewide Transportation Improvement Program.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a metropolitan planning organization or transportation
 planning agency shall not be required to submit a Federal Transportation Improvement Program to the department for 2020.

(f) Not later than July 1 of each year, the metropolitan planning organizations, and the regional transportation planning agencies, receiving obligational authority under this article shall notify the department of the projected amount of obligational authority that each entity intends to use during the remainder of the current federal fiscal year, including, but not limited to, a list of projects that will be obligated by the end of the current federal fiscal year. Any federal obligational authority that will not be used shall be redistributed by the department to other projects in a manner that ensures that the state will continue to compete for and receive increased obligational authority during the federal
 redistribution of obligational authority. If the department does not have sufficient federal apportionments to fully use excess obligational authority, the metropolitan planning organizations or regional transportation planning agencies relinquishing obligational authority shall make sufficient apportionments available to the department to fund alternate projects, when practical, within the geographical areas relinquishing the obligational authority. Notwithstanding this subdivision, the department shall comply with Section 133(d)(3) and (f) of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(g) A regional transportation planning agency that is not designated as, or
 represented by, a metropolitan planning organization with an urbanized area population greater than 200,000 pursuant to the 1990 federal census may exchange its annual apportionment received pursuant to this section on a dollar-for-dollar basis for nonfederal State Highway Account funds, which shall be apportioned in accordance with subdivision (d).

(h) (1) If a regional transportation planning agency described in subdivision (g) does not elect to exchange its annual apportionment, a county located within the boundaries of that regional transportation planning agency may elect to exchange its annual apportionment received pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for nonfederal State Highway Account funds.

(2) A county not included in a
 regional transportation planning agency described in subdivision (g), whose apportionment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) was less than 1 percent of the total amount apportioned to all counties in the state, may exchange its apportionment for nonfederal State Highway Account funds. If the apportionment to the county was more than 312 percent of the total apportioned to all counties in the state, it may exchange that portion of its apportionment in excess of 312 percent for nonfederal State Highway Account funds. Exchange funds received by a county pursuant to this section may be used for any transportation purpose.

(i) The department shall be
 responsible for closely monitoring the use of federal transportation funds, including regional surface transportation program funds to ensure full and timely use. The department shall prepare a quarterly report for submission to the commission regarding the progress in use of all federal transportation funds. The department shall notify the commission and the appropriate implementation agency whenever there is a failure to use federal funds within the three-year apportionment period established under subdivision (b).

(j) The department shall provide written notice to implementing agencies when there is one year remaining within the three-year apportionment period established under subdivision (b) of this section.

(k) Within six months of the date of notification required under subdivision
 (j), the implementing agency shall provide to the department a plan to obligate funds that includes, but need not be limited to, a list of projects and milestones.

(l) If the implementing agency has not met the milestones established in the implementation plan required under subdivision (k), before the end of the three-year apportionment period established under subdivision (b), the commission shall redirect those funds for use on other transportation projects in the state.

(m) Notwithstanding subdivisions (g) and (h), regional surface transportation program funds available under this section exchanged pursuant to Section 182.8 may be loaned to and expended by the department. The department shall repay from the State Highway Account to the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund all funds
 received as federal reimbursements for funds exchanged under Section 182.8 as they are received from the Federal Highway Administration, except that those repayments are not required to be made more frequently than on a quarterly basis.

(n) Before determining the amount for local subvention required by this section, the department shall first deduct the amount authorized by the Legislature for increased department oversight of the federal subvented program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 113, Sec. 2.   (SB 1291)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

182.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 182 and 182.5, Sections 188, 188.8, and 825 do not apply to the expenditure of an amount of federal funds equal to the amount of federal funds apportioned to the state pursuant to Section 104(b)(4) of Title 23 of the United States Code. These funds shall be known as the congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program funds and shall be expended in accordance with Section 149 of Title 23 of the United States Code, including the requirements relating to particulate matter less than 2.5 micrometers in diameter in
 Section 149(g) and (k) of that title. The department, the transportation planning agencies, and the metropolitan planning organizations may do all things necessary in their jurisdictions to secure and expend those federal funds in accordance with the intent of federal law and this chapter.

(b) The congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program funds shall be apportioned by the department to the metropolitan planning organizations designated pursuant to Section 134 of Title 23 of the United States Code and, in areas where none has been designated, to the transportation planning agency established by Section 29532 or 29532.1 of the Government Code. All funds apportioned to the state pursuant to Section 104(b)(4) of Title 23 of the United States Code shall be apportioned to metropolitan planning
 organizations and transportation planning agencies responsible for air quality conformity determinations in federally designated air quality nonattainment and maintenance areas within the state as follows:

(1) The department shall apportion these funds in the ratio that the weighted nonattainment and maintenance population in each federally designated area within the state bears to the total of all weighted nonattainment and maintenance area populations in the state.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the weighted nonattainment and maintenance area population shall be calculated by multiplying the population of each area in the state that is a nonattainment area or maintenance area as described in Section 149(b) of Title 23 of the United States Code for ozone or carbon monoxide by
 the following factors:

(A) A factor of 1.0, if, at the time of apportionment, the area is a maintenance area.

(B) A factor of 1.0, if, at the time of the apportionment, the area is classified as a marginal ozone nonattainment area under Subpart 2 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7511 et seq.).

(C) A factor of 1.1, if, at the time of the apportionment, the area is classified as a moderate ozone nonattainment area under Subpart 2 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7511 et seq.).

(D) A factor of 1.2, if, at the time of the apportionment, the area is classified as a serious ozone nonattainment area under
 Subpart 2 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7511 et seq.).

(E) A factor of 1.3, if, at the time of the apportionment, the area is classified as a severe ozone nonattainment area under Subpart 2 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7511 et seq.).

(F) A factor of 1.4, if, at the time of the apportionment, the area is classified as an extreme ozone nonattainment area under Subpart 2 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7511 et seq.).

(G) A factor of 1.0, if, at the time of the apportionment, the area is not a nonattainment or maintenance area for ozone, but is classified under Subpart 3 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7512
 et seq.) as a nonattainment area for carbon monoxide.

(H) A factor of 1.0, if, at the time of the apportionment, an area is designated as a nonattainment area for ozone under Subpart 1 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7512 et seq.).

(3) If, in addition to being designated as a nonattainment or maintenance area for ozone as described in paragraph (2), any county within the area is also classified under Subpart 3 of Part D of Title I of the Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7512 et seq.) as a nonattainment or maintenance area described in paragraph (2) for carbon monoxide, the weighted nonattainment or maintenance area population of the county, as determined under subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, or subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2), shall be
 further multiplied by a factor of 1.2.

(4) Funds allocated under this subdivision shall remain available for three federal fiscal years, including the federal fiscal year apportioned.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), where county transportation commissions have been created by the County Transportation Commissions Act (Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code), all congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program funds shall be further apportioned by the metropolitan planning organization to the county transportation commission on the basis of relative population within the federally designated air quality nonattainment and maintenance areas after first apportioning to the nonattainment and maintenance
 areas in the manner and in accordance with the formula set forth in subdivision (b).

 (2) In the Monterey Bay region, all congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program funds shall be further apportioned, on the basis of relative population, by the metropolitan planning organization to the regional transportation planning agencies designated under subdivision (b) of Section 29532 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) The department shall notify each metropolitan planning organization, transportation planning agency, and county transportation commission receiving an apportionment under this section, as soon as possible each year, of the amount of obligational authority estimated to be available for expenditure from the federal apportionment. The
 metropolitan planning organizations, transportation planning agencies, and county transportation commissions, in cooperation with the department, congestion
 management agencies, cities and counties, and affected transit operators, shall select and program projects in conformance with federal law. Each metropolitan planning organization and transportation planning agency shall, not later than October 1 of each even-numbered year, submit its Federal Transportation Improvement Program prepared pursuant to Section 134 of Title 23 of the United States Code to the department for incorporation into the Federal Statewide Transportation Improvement Program. Federal Transportation Improvement Programs shall, at a minimum, include the years covered by the Federal Statewide Transportation Improvement Program.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a metropolitan planning organization or transportation planning agency shall not be required to submit a Federal Transportation Improvement Program to
 the department for 2020.

(e) Not later than July 1 of each year, the metropolitan planning organizations and the regional transportation planning agencies receiving obligational authority under this section, shall notify the department of the projected amount of obligational authority that each entity intends to use during the remainder of the current federal fiscal year, including, but not limited to, a list of projects that will use the obligational authority. Any federal obligational authority that will not be used shall be redistributed by the department to other projects in a manner that ensures that the state will continue to compete for and receive increased obligational authority during the federal redistribution of obligational authority. If the department does not have sufficient federal apportionments to fully use excess
 obligational authority, the metropolitan planning organization or transportation planning agency relinquishing obligational authority shall make sufficient funding available to the department to fund alternate projects, when practical, within the geographical areas relinquishing the obligational authority. Notwithstanding this subdivision, the department shall comply with Section 133(f) of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(f) The department shall be responsible for closely monitoring the use of federal transportation funds, including congestion management and air quality
 improvement program funds to ensure full and timely use. The department shall prepare a quarterly report for submission to the commission regarding the progress in use of all federal transportation funds. The department shall notify the commission and the appropriate implementation agency whenever there is a failure to use federal funds within the three-year apportionment period established under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(g) The department shall provide written notice to implementing agencies when there is one year remaining within the three-year apportionment period established under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(h) Within six months of the date of notification required under subdivision (g), the implementing agency shall provide to the department a plan
 to obligate funds that includes, but need not be limited to, a list of projects and milestones.

(i) If the implementing agency has not met the milestones established in the implementation plan required under subdivision (h), before the end of the three-year apportionment period established under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the commission shall redirect those funds for use on other transportation projects in the state.

(j) Congestion mitigation and air quality improvement program funds available under this section exchanged pursuant to Section 182.8 may be loaned to and expended by the department. The department shall repay from the State Highway Account to the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund all funds received as federal reimbursements for funds exchanged under Section
 182.8 as they are received from the Federal Highway Administration, except that those repayments are not required to be made more frequently than on a quarterly basis.

(k) Before determining the amount for local subvention required by this section, the department shall first deduct the amount authorized by the Legislature for increased department oversight of the federal subvented program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 113, Sec. 3.   (SB 1291)   Effective September 18, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

182.8.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this program help increase flexibility in the use of state and federal funding to complete transportation improvements. The ability to exchange certain federal funds for state funds may enhance that flexibility. However, it is the intent of the Legislature that the commission make these exchanges only if the exchanges do not compromise other state funded projects or activities.

(b) The commission shall propose guidelines and procedures to implement this section, hold a public hearing on the guidelines, and adopt the guidelines on or before February 1, 2001. The commission shall begin the exchange program on or before February 1, 2001, if
 it determines that funding is available for that purpose. The commission may amend its guidelines after holding a public hearing, but may not amend the guidelines between the time it notifies regional transportation planning agencies of the amount of state funds available for exchange and its approval of projects for exchange in any given year.

(c) On or before January 5 of each year, the department shall report to the commission the amounts apportioned as federal local assistance in the regional surface transportation and congestion mitigation and air quality programs for the year, the Federal Obligation Authority for the year, and the amount of federal funds it expects to be able to obligate for work on projects in all programs on or before September 30 of that year, and the commission, in cooperation with the department, shall determine the amount of state funds from the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund that can be made available for exchange
 under this section. If the release of federal apportionments and obligational authority is delayed beyond November 1 in any year, all the dates specified in this section shall be extended by an equivalent time, however, all federal funds exchanged shall be obligated on or before September 30 of the current federal fiscal year.

(d) The commission may exchange funds under this section if it determines all of the following:

(1) Adequate state funds are available to accomplish the exchange without putting at risk other transportation activities or projects needing state funds.

(2) Any exchange will be consistent with full implementation of the Traffic Congestion Relief Act of 2000.

(3) Federal funds received in exchange can be readily and effectively used
 on other projects or activities by the state during the federal fiscal year.

(e) After making the determinations set forth in subdivision (d) the commission may offer to exchange state funds from the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund for federal local assistance funds, subject to the limits imposed under this section. For the purpose of this section, “federal local assistance” funds means regional surface transportation program or congestion mitigation and air quality program apportionments received that federal fiscal year and apportioned as local assistance pursuant to Sections 182.6 and 182.7.

(f) Not later than February 1 of each year, the commission shall notify the regional transportation planning agencies of the amount of state funds available for exchange for federal local assistance funds for that year. The maximum amount of state funds to be exchanged may not exceed 50
 percent of the total amount of federal regional surface transportation program and congestion mitigation and air quality program funds apportioned for the current fiscal year as local assistance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 182.6 and subdivision (b) of Section 182.7, exclusive of state funds that may be exchanged pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 182.6, paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 182.6, or Section 182.7. Federal funds exchanged under this program shall be available for projects identified by the commission as ready to obligate during determination of the amount available for exchange. The amount of exchange may not exceed the department’s ability to obligate all federal funds during the current federal fiscal year. The commission may not exchange state funds for regional surface transportation program funds required to be spent for transportation enhancements. This section does not affect the amount of exchange under subdivision (g) of Sections 182.6, or paragraphs
 (1) and (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 182.6.

(g) Regional transportation planning agencies may submit applications for exchange of funds to the commission not later than March 15 of each year. Applications shall identify the proposed use for the exchange funds, including project descriptions, cost estimates, scopes of work, schedules for construction, schedules for expenditures, and any other information required by the commission. The commission may require a region to identify priorities among applications it submits.

(h) If the commission receives applications for more exchange funds than the amount of state funds available, the commission shall select projects for exchange up to the amount of state funds available. The commission shall explain the criteria it uses to select projects, which shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Removal of all federal funds from projects.

(2) Assessment of projects that would benefit most from removal of federal funding because of size, type, location, agency capability, features, or federal requirements.

(3) Approximate relative equity within the program among regions in receiving state exchange funds over a multiyear period.

(i) The commission may exchange state funds for federal local assistance funds with agencies requesting exchanges. Agencies wishing to exchange their federal funds shall provide apportionments and obligation authority at the same rate the Federal Highway Administration distributes obligation authority. Agencies exchanging federal funds shall receive funds equal to 90 percent of the obligation authority exchanged. The
 commission shall approve exchanges of funds not later than its second regularly scheduled meeting following March 15 each year.

(j) The commission shall determine an exchange payment schedule based on expenditure plans. The commission may suspend exchange payment schedules if it determines projects are not proceeding.

(k) For financial display and reporting purposes, obligational authority received pursuant to this section shall be reported as a revenue accrual in the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund in the year in which the exchange is approved under subdivision (i). Funds approved for exchange shall be accrued as expenditures in the year in which the exchange is approved. Notwithstanding Section 16362 of the Government Code, the department shall repay from the State Highway Account to the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund all funds received as federal reimbursements for funds
 exchanged under this section as they are received from the Federal Highway Administration, except that those repayments are not required to be made more frequently than on a quarterly basis.

(l) State funds provided through an exchange under this section shall be encumbered within one year and expended within three years.

(m) Upon adoption of its implementing guidelines, the commission may consider requests for exchanges under this section.

(n) Regional and local agencies shall use state exchange funds only for projects or purposes for which the federal local assistance funds being exchanged were originally intended, and may not supplant local funds on projects in order that those local funds can subsequently be used for nontransportation purposes. The commission may require agencies to certify that they are
 meeting this requirement. Agencies not meeting this maintenance of effort requirement may not be allowed to participate in the next exchange cycle.

(o) Not later than the effective date of the reauthorization of the federal surface transportation act, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor and the Legislature recommending any changes in the exchange program necessitated by that reauthorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 171.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

182.85.

(a) For purposes of this section, the term “federal local assistance funds” means either of the following:

(1) Highway Safety Improvement Program (23 U.S.C. Sec. 148) apportionments received in a federal fiscal year (23 U.S.C. Sec. 104(b)(3)) and allocated as local assistance pursuant to this
 chapter, excluding funds that are set aside for the railway-highway crossings program (23 U.S.C. Sec. 130).

(2) Federal funds apportioned for local bridge projects.

(b) To increase flexibility in the use of state and federal funding to complete transportation improvements, the department may exchange nonfederal State Highway Account funds on a dollar-for-dollar basis for federal local assistance funds
 received by a city, county, or city and county.

(c) Participating agencies exchanging their federal funds shall provide apportionments and obligation authority at the same rate the Federal Highway Administration distributes obligation authority.

(d) The department shall not exchange state funds pursuant to this section unless the exchange meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The exchange will be
 used by the city, county, or city and county for projects or purposes for which the federal local assistance funds being exchanged were originally intended in order to meet national transportation goals and performance management measures (23 U.S.C. Sec. 150), and the exchange will satisfy the intent of the Legislature, as described in Section 2333.

(2) The exchange will not put at risk other transportation activities or projects needing state funds.

(3) Federal funds received in exchange can be readily and effectively used on other projects by the state during the federal fiscal year.

(4) The amount of exchange will not exceed the department’s ability to obligate all federal funds received in exchange during the current federal fiscal year.

(5) The total amount of federal funds exchanged pursuant to this section does not exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) during the federal fiscal year.

(e) The department shall consult with the League of California Cities and the California State Association of Counties on implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   (SB 137)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

182.9.

There shall be appropriated from nonfederal funds in the State Highway Account, and the commission shall allocate to each county, an amount, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) each fiscal year, equal to 50 percent of the amount allocated to the county pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 182.6. The amount shall not be reduced by any exchange of funds made pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 182. Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be used to match the federal funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 182.6 or, if excess, may be used for any transportation purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

183.

(a) All money in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund derived from federal sources or from appropriations to other state agencies, or deposited in the account by local agencies or by others, is continuously appropriated to, and shall be available for expenditure by, the department for the purposes for which the money was made available.

Unless otherwise expressly provided for by law, none of the balance of the money in the State Highway Account shall be expended until it has been specifically appropriated by the Legislature or made available pursuant to Section 13322 of the Government Code.

The Budget Act appropriations shall be made on a
 program basis only and shall not identify the specific capital outlay projects to be funded. The commission shall be responsible for allocating the funds to specific projects within the budget program categories, except that all funds described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2200) of Division 3 shall be allocated on a program basis to the department for allocation pursuant to that chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing with the 1985–86 Budget, the department shall submit with its budget requests a detailed description of the acquisition, improvement, and construction of office building projects to the Legislature for review. The total amount appropriated for those projects shall be identified as a separate line item in the Budget Act. Funds appropriated for those projects shall be allocated by the commission only for projects which have been approved by the Legislature. Minor projects are to be defined consistent with
 Section 167. The commission may substitute for approved minor projects, if the total sum of minor projects is within the amount approved by the Legislature.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon order of the Department of Finance, all or some of the state agencies collecting revenues for, or spending from, the State Highway Account shall adjust budgeting, accounting, and reporting systems and documents so that unliquidated encumbrances, payables, and other accruals are not reflected in the fund balance in the Governor’s Budget fund condition display or the fund balance in the financial statements submitted to the Controller for the budgetary-legal basis annual report.

(2) For the purposes of the Governor’s Budget, the balance of cash advanced from the State Highway Account to the Transportation Revolving Account, as jointly determined by
 the Department of Finance and the state agencies referenced in paragraph (1), shall be deemed as resources and cash available to the Transportation Deferred Investment Fund for budgeting purposes.

(3) This method shall be effective with the 2013–14 Governor’s Budget development process and may be applied to the 2011–12 data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 11.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

183.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 182 or any other provision of law, money deposited into the account that is not subject to Article XIX of the California Constitution, including, but not limited to, money that is derived from the sale of documents, charges for miscellaneous services to the public, condemnation deposits fund investments, rental of state property, or any other miscellaneous uses of property or money, may be used for any transportation purpose authorized by statute, upon appropriation by the Legislature or, after transfer to another fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature from that fund.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, and not later than November 1 of each fiscal year thereafter,
 based on prior year financial statements, the Controller shall transfer the funds identified in subdivision (a) for the prior fiscal year from the State Highway Account to the Transportation Debt Service Fund in the State Transportation Fund, and those funds are continuously appropriated for the purposes specified for the Transportation Debt Service Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 12.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

183.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the repayment date for the loan of one hundred thirty-five million dollars ($135,000,000) made from the State Highway Account to the General Fund pursuant to Item 2660-011-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2009 is extended from June 30, 2012, to June 30, 2013. The Legislature finds and declares that the revenues to make the loan were derived from vehicle weight fees deposited in the State Highway Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 6, Sec. 33.   (AB 105)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

183.3.

(a) Upon the order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer the sum of one hundred seventy-three million dollars ($173,000,000) from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund to the General Fund. This transfer of money constitutes a loan under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 6 of Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(b) The General Fund shall pay interest to the State Highway Account on the loan authorized by subdivision (a) at the rate earned by the Surplus Money Investment Fund. The interest shall be calculated annually and the loan shall be repaid no later than June 30, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 445, Sec. 8.   Effective September 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

183.4.

(a) The department may advance funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund to a local agency for all or a portion of the cost of a project approved for bond funding pursuant to Part 11.5 (commencing with Section 99600) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code. The director shall first make a finding that there are adequate funds for the advancement without delaying or adversely affecting any other project. The total amount advanced shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee created by Section 99692 of the Public Utilities Code has, by resolution, authorized to be sold.

(b) All advances shall be subject to the terms and conditions of an agreement between the department and a local agency. The agreement shall contain provisions for reimbursement of the State Highway Account from the proceeds of the next bond sale for funds advanced pursuant to this section. Any amounts advanced pursuant to this section shall be repaid with interest at the rate being earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of the advance. Interest payments shall be made from funds of the local agency other than from the proceeds of bonds authorized by Part 11.5 (commencing with Section 99600) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 25, Sec. 3.   Effective April 1, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

183.5.

No funds from the State Highway Account shall be budgeted, allocated, or expended for any project which calls for any change in passenger train stations or loading platforms used by the National Railroad Passenger Corporation unless the change has been submitted to the National Railroad Passenger Corporation for review and comment which may include a recommendation for a modification in the change. If the agency submitting the change elects not to accept the recommendation of the National Railroad Passenger Corporation, it shall submit the matter to the director who shall determine whether the disputed recommendation for a modification in the change shall be followed by the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

184.

The department shall set up and keep the accounts necessary to show all expenditures from the State Highway Account for the several purposes authorized or required by this article, and shall make and keep on file in the office of the department an annual statement showing all expenditures from the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

185.

All money withdrawn from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund shall be withdrawn in the manner provided by law upon demands made by the department.

The department may establish a revolving fund to be administered pursuant to Section 16400 of the Government Code and to serve as a revolving fund from which relocation assistance payments may be made pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

185.5.

The director shall pay from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund that portion of the administrative expenses of the department that he determines, in consultation with the commisson, to have resulted from the functions of the department for purposes specified in Section 2101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

186.3.

Funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2106 may be expended for highway-oriented transportation studies requested by a state or federal agency. Any expenditure of funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2106 or 2107 by a county or city for the acquisition of rights-of-way or construction upon a state highway, or upon a county road or city street not under the jurisdiction of the county or city that complements the system of roads or streets of the county or city, shall be deemed an expenditure upon the system of roads or streets of the county or city, as the case may be, making such expenditure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 865.)
-------------------------------------------

186.5.

Whenever local entities are unable to agree upon the number and width of traffic lanes for a street or road proposed to be constructed by any such entity where such specifications will affect the uniform flow of traffic on a road or street from one such local entity to another, the matter may be submitted to the department. The department shall thereupon endeavor to establish such specifications for such street or road proposed to be constructed, and, if established, such specifications shall be binding upon the local entity constructing such road or street.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

186.6.

There is hereby appropriated to the commission from the Motor Vehicle Fuel Fund an amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) annually for work done by the department in assisting the Controller in carrying out duties imposed upon his office in reviewing, approving or modifying the expenditure of highway user funds by local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

187.

For the purpose of allocating State funds available for highway purposes the counties of the State are placed in these two groups:

Group No. 1. All those counties not included in Group No. 2.

Group No. 2. The counties of San Luis Obispo, Kern, Mono, Tulare, Inyo, Santa Barbara, Ventura, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, Orange, Riverside, San Diego and Imperial.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

188.

(a) All federal and state funds to be allocated by the commission, or expended by the department, for transportation improvements under Section 164, except for purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c) of that section, shall be programmed during the period commencing on July 1, 1997, and ending on June 30, 2004, and for each four-year period thereafter, 40 percent in County Group No. 1 and 60 percent in County Group No. 2.

(b) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Barnes-Mills-Walsh formula.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 622, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

188.1.
